California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(B) Establish audit requirements that shall be satisfied before a credit certificate may be issued by the California Film Commission.

(C) (i) Establish a procedure for a qualified taxpayer to report to the California Film Commission, prior to the issuance of a credit certificate, the following information:

(I) If readily available, a list of the states, provinces, or other jurisdictions in which any member of the applicant’s combined reporting group in the same business unit as the qualified taxpayer that, in the preceding calendar year, has produced a
 qualified motion picture intended for release in the United States market. For purposes of this clause, “qualified motion picture” shall not include any episodes of a television series that were complete or in production prior to July 1, 2020.

(II) Whether a qualified motion picture described in subclause (I) was awarded any financial incentive by the state, province, or other jurisdiction that was predicated on the performance of primary principal photography or postproduction in that location.

(ii) The California Film Commission may provide that the report required by this subparagraph be filed in a single report provided on a calendar year basis for those qualified taxpayers that receive multiple credit certificates in a calendar year.

(D) Issue a credit certificate to a qualified taxpayer upon completion of the
 qualified motion picture reflecting the credit amount allocated after qualified expenditures have been verified and the jobs ratio computed under this section. The amount of credit shown on the credit certificate shall not exceed the amount of credit allocated to that qualified taxpayer pursuant to this section.

(4) Obtain, when possible, the following information from applicants that do not receive an allocation of credit:

(A) Whether the qualified motion picture that was the subject of the application was completed.

(B) If completed, in which state or foreign jurisdiction was the primary principal photography completed.

(C) Whether the applicant received any financial incentives from the state or foreign jurisdiction to make the qualified motion
 picture in that location.

(5) Provide the Legislative Analyst’s Office, upon request, any or all application materials or any other materials received from, or submitted by, applicants for which a credit allocation decision has been made, including, but not limited to, applicants that did not receive a credit allocation. Materials provided to the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall be in electronic format when available and include, but not be limited to, information provided pursuant to clauses (i) to (xii), inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) and the diversity workplans provided pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (k).

(6) The information provided to the California Film Commission pursuant to this section shall constitute confidential tax information for purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 19542) of Chapter 7 of Part
 10.2.

(7) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, on or after July 1, 2025, the California Film Commission may allocate, pursuant to this section, any previously allocated credits not certified that have not previously been added to credit amounts available for allocation under this section or a successor section or sections.

(B) For purposes of this section, “previously allocated credits not certified” means either:

(i) Credits allocated under paragraph (1) for which the qualified taxpayer to which the credit amounts were originally allocated has notified the California Film Commission in writing that the qualified taxpayer will not request certification for the allocated credits.

(ii) The difference between the amount of credits
 allocated under paragraph (1) to a qualified taxpayer and the amount of credits the California Film Commission certified, for that qualified taxpayer. For purposes of calculating the difference, the California Film Commission shall not consider any credit amounts for which the qualified taxpayer notifies the California Film Commission under clause (i).

(8) Notwithstanding any other law, on or after July 1, 2025, the California Film Commission may allocate, pursuant to this section, any credit amounts described in subparagraphs (B) and (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) that have not previously been added to credit amounts available for allocation under this section or a successor section or sections.

(9) The California Film Commission shall submit a report to the Legislature, on an annual basis beginning January 1, 2022, on aggregate diversity information for the productions
 allocated tax credits allowed in this section and the diversity of the motion picture production industry in California more generally.

(h) (1) The California Film Commission shall annually provide the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the Franchise Tax Board, and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration with a list of qualified taxpayers and the tax credit amounts allocated to each qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission. The list shall include the names and taxpayer identification numbers, including taxpayer identification numbers of each partner or shareholder, as applicable, of the qualified taxpayer.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (6) of subdivision (g), the California Film Commission shall annually post on its internet website and make available for public release the following:

(i) A table which includes all of the following information: a list of qualified taxpayers and the tax credit amounts allocated to each qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission, the number of production days in California the qualified taxpayer represented in its application would occur, the number of California jobs that the qualified taxpayer represented in its application would be directly created by the production, and the total amount of qualified expenditures expected to be spent by the production.

(ii) A narrative staff summary describing the production of the qualified taxpayer as well as background information regarding the qualified taxpayer contained in the qualified taxpayer’s application for the credit.

(iii) For qualified taxpayers allocated a credit, the aggregate diversity information
 collected pursuant to clauses (iv) and (xii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) organized per production and an aggregate compilation describing the voluntary programs collected pursuant to clause (xiii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(B) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to make the information submitted by an applicant for a tax credit under this section a public record, including for the purposes of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(3) The California Film Commission shall provide each city and county in California with an instructional guide that includes, but is not limited to, a review of best practices for facilitating motion picture production in local jurisdictions, resources on hosting and encouraging motion picture production,
 and the California Film Commission’s Model Filming Ordinance. The California Film Commission shall maintain on its internet website a list of initiatives by locality that encourage motion picture production in regions across the state. The list shall be distributed to each approved applicant for the program to highlight local jurisdictions that offer incentives to facilitate film production.

(i) (1) (A) The aggregate amount of credits that may be allocated for a fiscal year pursuant to this section and Section 23698, except as provided in subdivision (k) of this section and subdivision (k) of Section 23698, is three hundred thirty million dollars ($330,000,000), plus any amount described in subparagraph (B), (C), (D), or (E) in credits for the 2020–21 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, through and including the 2024–25 fiscal year, except as provided in paragraph (7) of subdivision (g), plus
 the amount described in subparagraph (F) in credits for the 2021–22 and 2022–23 fiscal years.

(B) (i) Subject to clauses (ii) and (iii), the unused allocation credit amount, if any, for the preceding fiscal year.

(ii) The amount of unused credit allocation attributable to independent films shall only be allocated according to clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(iii) The total amount of any unused credit allocation amount that is remaining shall only be allocated pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(C) The amount of previously allocated credits not certified.

(D) The amount of any credits reduced pursuant to paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (d).

(E) That portion of any unused allocation credit amount, if any, attributable to Section 17053.85, 17053.95, 23685, or 23695 available for that fiscal year in a manner as determined by regulations promulgated by the California Film Commission.

(F) (i) For fiscal years 2021–22 and 2022–23, the California Film Commission shall allocate an additional fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) in credits to be granted exclusively to television series that relocate to California.

(I) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of this subdivision and clause (v) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), the moneys allocated pursuant to this subparagraph shall not be redirected or reallocated.

(II) Notwithstanding paragraph (25) of subdivision (b), for purposes of this subparagraph, a “television series that relocated to California” means a television series, without regard to episode length or initial media exhibition, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode that both filmed at least 75 percent of principal photography days for at least one episode outside of California and has not filmed more than 25 percent of principal photography days for any episode inside of California.

(ii) For fiscal years 2021–22 and 2022–23, the California Film Commission shall allocate an additional seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) in credits to be granted exclusively to recurring television series.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding the foregoing, and subject to paragraph (4) of this subdivision and changes in
 allocations pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), the California Film Commission shall allocate the credit amounts subject to the following categories:

(i) Independent films with qualified expenditures of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less shall be allocated 4.8 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1). Independent films with qualified expenditures in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be allocated 3.2 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1). These amounts shall be in addition to any unused allocation credit amount, if any, for the preceding fiscal year as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(ii) Features shall be allocated 35 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(iii) A relocating television series shall be
 allocated 17 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(iv) A new television series, pilots for a new television series, miniseries, and recurring television series shall be allocated 40 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1), plus any unused allocation credit amount, if any, for the preceding fiscal year as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(B) Within any allocation period for credits to a relocating television series, any unused amount shall be reallocated to the category described in clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) and, if any unused amount remains, reallocated in the next allocation period for credits to a relocating television series.

(C) With respect to a relocating television series issued a credit in a subsequent year pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2)
 of subdivision (g), that subsequent credit amount shall be allowed from the allocation amount described in clause (iv) of subparagraph (A).

(3) Any act that reduces the amount that may be allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) constitutes a change in state taxes for the purpose of increasing revenues within the meaning of Section 3 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and may be passed by not less than two-thirds of all Members elected to each of the two houses of the Legislature.

(4) A qualified motion picture, as defined in subdivision (k), shall not be eligible for an allocation under subdivisions (a) to (j), inclusive, if it receives a credit under subdivision (k) during that fiscal year.

(j) The California Film Commission shall have the authority to allocate tax credits in
 accordance with this section and in accordance with any regulations prescribed pursuant to subdivision (e) upon adoption.

(k) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2032, there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, subject to allocation by the California Film Commission, in an amount equal to:

(A) For credits allocated before July 1, 2025, 20 percent or 25 percent, whichever is the applicable credit percentage described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), as modified by paragraph (3) of this subdivision, of the qualified expenditures for the production of a qualified motion picture produced in the state at a certified studio construction project.

(B) For credits allocated on or after July
 1, 2025, 35 percent or 40 percent, whichever is the applicable credit percentage described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 17053.98.1, as modified by paragraph (3) of this subdivision, of the qualified expenditures for the production of a qualified motion picture produced in the state at a certified studio construction project.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the definitions in subdivision (b) shall apply except as otherwise provided in this subdivision.

(A) “Certified studio construction project” means a construction or renovation project certified for a period of five years by the California Film Commission as having met all of the following criteria:

(i) The project provides for the construction or renovation of one or more soundstages located in the state.

(ii) Actual construction or renovation expenditures are not less than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) of actual construction or renovation expenditures made over not more than five continuous calendar years.

(iii) The construction or renovation of each certified studio construction project is performed in accordance with Section 17053.99.

(iv) The construction or renovation of each certified studio construction project commences pursuant to a foundation permit or a structural building permit for the construction or renovation that is issued after the effective date of the act adopting this subdivision.

(v) The certified studio construction project applicant or its affiliates shall not have received a California Competes Grant under Section
 12096.6 of the Government Code for wages or investment related to construction of the studio construction project.

(B) “Qualified motion picture” means a qualified motion picture, as defined in subdivision (b), that meets all of the following requirements:

(i) During the production period, the qualified motion picture films at least 50 percent of its principal photography stage shooting days on a soundstage or soundstages certified as a certified studio construction project.

(ii) During the production period, the qualified motion picture pays or incurs at least five million dollars ($5,000,000) in qualified wages for filming on a soundstage or soundstages certified as a certified studio construction project.

(iii) For taxable years beginning before
 January 1, 2025, is produced by a qualified taxpayer that is either of the following:

(I) More than 50 percent owned, directly or indirectly, by the same owner or owners of the soundstage or soundstages that is part of a certified studio construction project on which the production is filmed.

(II) Entered into a contract or lease of 10 years or more with the owner or owners of a certified studio construction project on which the production is filmed.

(iv) Provides a diversity workplan that is approved by the California Film Commission.

(C) For purposes of this subdivision, a qualified taxpayer and a taxpayer include a passthrough entity and a disregarded entity.

(3) (A) The diversity workplan required pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) shall include all of the following:

(i) A statement of the diversity goals the motion picture will seek to achieve in terms of qualified wages paid by race, ethnicity, gender, disability status, and for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, veteran status.

(ii) A statement of the diversity goals the motion picture will seek to achieve for individuals whose wages are excluded from qualified wages as set forth in clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (21) of subdivision (b), with respect to both compensation and to the representation of diversity in the creative aspects of the motion picture.

(iii) A plan of what strategies the motion picture will employ to achieve the goals in clauses (i)
 and (ii).

(B) The diversity workplan shall include goals that are broadly reflective of California’s population, in terms of race, ethnicity, gender, disability status, and for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, veteran status. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the diversity workplan shall indicate the ZIP Code for those members of the workforce whose wages are qualified expenditures and those whose wages are not qualified expenditures.

(C) The California Film Commission shall approve or reject the diversity workplan of an applicant, to the extent allowed by federal and state law.

(D) (i) The California Film Commission shall not certify any tax credit under this subdivision until they have received a final diversity report from the qualified motion
 picture applicant.

(ii) The final diversity report shall calculate and provide evidence for the extent to which the applicant met the diversity goals laid out in their diversity workplan.

(iii) The California Film Commission shall have the authority to audit the final diversity report to determine if the diversity goals set forth in the applicant’s diversity workplan for the motion picture production were achieved.

(iv) If the California Film Commission determines that the qualified motion picture applicant has met or made a good faith effort to meet the diversity goals in its diversity workplan, the applicant’s credit percentage described in paragraph (1) shall be increased by up to four percentage points as follows:

(I) By two percentage points if the
 California Film Commission determines that the applicant has met or made a good faith effort to meet the diversity goals with respect to the diversity of the workforce employed by the applicant in its diversity workplan statement.

(II) By two percentage points if the California Film Commission determines that the applicant has met or made a good faith effort to meet the diversity goals with respect to individuals whose wages are excluded from qualified wages as set forth in clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (21) of subdivision (b), in its diversity workplan statement.

(E) The California Film Commission, in consultation with the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, shall establish guidelines to evaluate diversity workplans as described in this paragraph. The guidelines shall be posted on the California Film Commission’s internet website.

(4) The credit allowed under this subdivision shall be administered in accordance with subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (d), (h), and (l), except that paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not apply, paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) shall not apply, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) shall not apply.

(5) Subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2), subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (3), and paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (g) shall apply.

(6) A conflict between this subdivision and any other subdivisions in this section shall be reconciled in favor of this subdivision.

(7) The aggregate amount of credit allocated by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (j), inclusive, of this section and Section 23698 shall not be
 reduced by the tax credit allowed pursuant to this subdivision. The amount of credit allowed by this subdivision shall not be limited by subdivision (i).

(8) (A) The credit allocated pursuant to this subdivision shall be allowed for the taxable year in which the California Film Commission issues a credit certificate in accordance with the procedures provided for in subdivision (g) for the qualified motion picture. The California Film Commission shall issue a credit certificate to a qualified taxpayer upon completion of the qualified motion picture reflecting the credit amount allocated after qualified expenditures have been verified.

(B) The California Film Commission, commencing with fiscal year 2021–22, shall allocate tax credits each year to qualified motion pictures meeting the criteria of this subdivision. The total amount of credits that may be
 allocated under this subdivision is one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000). For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2025, the amount of credit that may be allocated to a qualified motion picture under this subdivision shall not exceed the greater of twelve million dollars ($12,000,000), or seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) per episode, for a season of a television series. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of credit that may be allocated to a qualified motion picture under this subdivision shall not exceed the greater of twenty-one million dollars ($21,000,000), or one million three hundred thousand dollars ($1,300,000) per episode, for a season of a television series. Recurring television series receiving an initial allocation under this subdivision shall be allocated for subsequent seasons no more than allowed under this paragraph.

(C) In any year the tax credits under this
 paragraph have been allocated by the California Film Commission, a qualified motion picture or a recurring television series that satisfies the criteria of this subdivision, but have not received an allocation of credits, may apply to receive an allocation of credits pursuant to subdivision (i).

(D) A qualified motion picture that satisfies the criteria of this subdivision, other than a recurring television series described in subparagraph (E) of this paragraph, that does not receive a credit allocation under this subdivision because the total amount of credits authorized for the program in subparagraph (B) has been allocated or the qualified motion picture commenced production during the sixth year the certified studio construction project has been certified by the California Film Commission, or any year thereafter, may apply for a credit allocation under subdivisions (a) through (j), inclusive, subject to the jobs ratio enhancement in
 subclause (II) of clause (iv) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(E) A recurring television series that satisfies the criteria of this subdivision and that is no longer eligible for a credit allocation under this subdivision for a reason described in subparagraph (D) shall receive a credit allocation under subdivisions (a) through (j), inclusive, pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(F) Credits shall be allocated based on the assumption that the motion picture meets the diversity criteria specified in clause (iv) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3).

(G) If any successor tax credit program that modifies or replaces the program specified in subdivisions (a) through (j), inclusive, of this section or Section 23698 is enacted, both of the following shall
 apply:

(i) A qualified motion picture described in subparagraph (D) may apply to receive an allocation of credits under the successor program.

(ii) A recurring television series described in subparagraph (E) shall receive an allocation of credits under the successor program.

(9) A qualified motion picture meeting the requirements of this subdivision that receives a credit allocation during the five-year period the certified studio construction project is certified by the California Film Commission shall be allowed a credit under this subdivision for subsequent seasons for the life of that recurring television series as long as the qualified motion picture continues to satisfy the criteria of this subdivision and to the extent the total credit amount the California Film Commission is permitted to allocate pursuant to
 subparagraph (B) of paragraph (8) has not previously been allocated.

(10) Within six months of the effective date of this subdivision, the California Film Commission shall:

(A) Establish procedures to certify a certified studio construction project.

(B) Establish procedures to verify a qualified motion picture has met the criteria established in this section for filming in a certified studio construction project facility. That procedure shall include a requirement that the qualified motion picture pay 0.5 percent of the approved credit amount to the Career Pathways Training program specified in subdivision (e).

(C) (i) Implementation of this subdivision for the 2023–24 fiscal year is deemed an emergency and necessary for the
 immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare and, therefore, the California Film Commission is hereby authorized to adopt emergency regulations to implement this subdivision during the 2023–24 fiscal year in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(ii) The California Film Commission shall adopt regulations in order to implement this paragraph.

(iii) The California Film Commission shall not be required to prepare an economic impact analysis pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) with regard to any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision.

(11) In the case where the credit allowed by this subdivision exceeds the taxpayer’s tax liability computed under this part, the excess credit may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding eight taxable years, if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.

(12) Upon completion of construction or renovation of the soundstage or soundstages, the certified studio construction project applicant shall certify to the California Film Commission that all contractors and subcontractors performing construction work on the soundstage or soundstages were required to use a skilled and trained workforce to perform such work in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 17053.99.

(13) (A) Upon completion of construction or renovation of the soundstage or
 soundstages, the soundstage or soundstages shall be continuously operated, maintained, and repaired by any of the following:

(i) A workforce that is paid at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, if such services are performed by a workforce that is employed directly, or indirectly through a motion picture payroll services company, by the owner or affiliate of the owner of the soundstage or lessee of the soundstage described in subclause (II) of clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of this subdivision.

(ii) A skilled and trained workforce as defined in Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, if such services are provided by third-party vendors.

(B) Each year following completion of construction or renovation of the soundstage or soundstages that a qualified motion picture is allocated a tax credit pursuant to this subdivision, the certified studio construction project applicant shall certify to the California Film Commission both of the following:

(i) The total amount of payments to third-party vendors or qualified wages for operation, maintenance, and repair of the certified soundstage.

(ii) The amount and percentage of the total amount of payments to third-party vendors or qualified wages for operation, maintenance, and repair of the certified soundstage performed by each workforce described in subparagraph (A).

(C) If the percentage paid to workers in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) is
 certified to be 90 percent of the total amount under clause (i) of subparagraph (B) or greater, the qualified taxpayer shall be entitled to 100 percent of the applicable credit issued under this subdivision for the period. If the percentage paid to workers in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) is certified to be less than 90 percent of the total amount under clause (i) of subparagraph (B) but greater than or equal to 75 percent of the total amount under clause (i) of subparagraph (B), the qualified taxpayer shall be entitled to 50 percent of the applicable credit issued under this subdivision for the period. If the percentage paid to workers in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) is certified to be less than 75 percent of the total amount under clause (i) of subparagraph (B), the qualified taxpayer shall not be entitled to any credit issued under this subdivision for the applicable period.

(14) (A) Except as provided in
 subparagraph (B), the changes made to this subdivision by the act adding this paragraph shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023.

(B) The changes made to subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) by the act adding this paragraph shall apply for all taxable years to any certified studio construction project that has been certified, and any qualified motion picture that has been allocated a credit, pursuant to this subdivision.

(l) Section 41 shall not apply to the credits allowed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 344, Sec. 4.   (SB 186)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.98.1.

(a) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, subject to a computation and ranking by the California Film Commission in subdivision (g) and the allocation amount categories described in subdivision (i), in an amount equal to 35 or 40 percent, whichever is the applicable credit percentage described in paragraph (4), of the qualified expenditures for the production of a qualified motion picture in California. A credit shall not be allowed under this section for any qualified expenditures for the production of a motion picture in California if a credit has been claimed for those same expenditures under Section 17053.85, 17053.95, or 17053.98.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the credit shall be allowed for the taxable year in which the California Film Commission issues the credit certificate pursuant to subdivision (g) for the qualified motion picture, but in no instance prior to July 1, 2025, and shall be for the applicable percentage of all qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer in all taxable years for that qualified motion picture.

(3) (A) The amount of the credit allowed to a qualified taxpayer shall be limited to the amount specified in the credit certificate issued to the qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g).

(B) In determining the amount specified in the credit certificate in subparagraph (A), the California Film Commission shall be limited
 to the following amounts of qualified expenditures for each qualified motion picture:

(i) In the case of a feature, up to one hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000).

(ii) In the case of a miniseries or limited series described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (19) of subdivision (b), up to one hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000).

(iii) In the case of a television series described in clause (iii) or clause (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (19) of subdivision (b), up to one hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000) per season.

(iv) In the case of an independent film, up to twenty million dollars ($20,000,000).

(4) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and
 (2), the applicable credit percentage shall be as follows:

(A) Thirty-five percent of the qualified expenditures attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California, including, but not limited to, a feature or a television series that relocated to California that is in its second or subsequent years of receiving a tax credit allocation pursuant to this section, or Section 17053.85, 17053.95, or 17053.98.

(B) Forty percent of the qualified expenditures attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California where the qualified motion picture is a television series that relocated to California in its first year of receiving a tax credit allocation pursuant to this section.

(C) Thirty-five percent of the qualified expenditures attributable to the production of a qualified motion
 picture that is an independent film.

(D) Additional credits shall be allowed for the production of a qualified motion picture which applicable credit percentage is determined pursuant to subparagraph (A), in an aggregate amount not to exceed 5 percent of the qualified expenditures under that subparagraph, as follows:

(i) (I) Five percent of qualified expenditures, excluding qualified wages described in subparagraph (E), relating to original photography outside the Los Angeles zone.

(II) For purposes of this clause and subparagraph (E):

(ia) “Applicable period” means the period that commences with preproduction and ends when original photography concludes. The applicable period includes the time necessary to strike a remote location
 and return to the Los Angeles zone.

(ib) “Los Angeles zone” means the area within a circle 30 miles in radius from Beverly Boulevard and La Cienega Boulevard, Los Angeles, California, and includes Agua Dulce, Castaic, including Castaic Lake, Leo Carrillo State Beach, Ontario International Airport, Piru, and Pomona, including the Los Angeles County Fairgrounds. The Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer, Inc. Conejo Ranch property is within the Los Angeles zone.

(ic) “Original photography” includes principal photography and reshooting original footage.

(id) “Qualified expenditures relating to original photography outside the Los Angeles zone” means amounts paid or incurred during the applicable period for tangible personal property purchased or leased and used or consumed outside the Los Angeles zone and relating to original photography
 outside the Los Angeles zone and qualified wages paid for services performed outside the Los Angeles zone and relating to original photography outside the Los Angeles zone.

(ii) Five percent of the qualified expenditures relating to qualified visual effects attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California.

(E) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (D), an amount equal to 10 percent of qualified wages paid for services performed relating to original photography outside of the Los Angeles zone to qualified individuals who reside in California but outside the Los Angeles zone shall be allowed as an additional credit for the production of a qualified motion picture which applicable credit percentage is determined pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C).

(ii) Notwithstanding
 subparagraph (D), an amount equal to 5 percent of qualified wages paid for services performed relating to original photography outside of the Los Angeles zone to qualified individuals who reside in California but outside the Los Angeles zone shall be allowed as an additional credit for the production of a qualified motion picture which applicable credit percentage is determined pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Ancillary product” means any article for sale to the public that contains a portion of, or any element of, the qualified motion picture.

(2) “Budget” means an estimate of all expenses paid or incurred during the production period of a qualified motion picture. It shall be the same budget used by the qualified taxpayer and production company for all qualified motion picture
 purposes.

(3) “Clip use” means a use of any portion of a motion picture, other than the qualified motion picture, used in the qualified motion picture.

(4) “Credit certificate” means the certificate issued by the California Film Commission pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (g).

(5) “Diversity workplan checklist” means a checklist developed by regulation by the California Film Commission that may include consideration of inclusive hiring above the line, inclusive hiring below the line, equity education, industry capacity building and supplier diversity as part of any diversity workplan.

(6) (A) “Employee fringe benefits” means the amount allowable as a deduction under this part to the qualified taxpayer
 involved in the production of the qualified motion picture, exclusive of any amounts contributed by employees, for any year during the production period with respect to any of the following:

(i) Employer contributions under any pension, profit sharing, annuity, or similar plan.

(ii) Employer-provided coverage under any accident or health plan for employees.

(iii) The employer’s cost of life or disability insurance provided to employees.

(B) Any amount treated as wages under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (21) shall not be taken into account under this paragraph.

(7) “Independent film” means a motion picture with a minimum budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) that is
 produced by a company that is not publicly traded and publicly traded companies do not own, directly or indirectly, more than 30 percent of the producing company.

(8) “Jobs ratio” means the amount of qualified wages paid to qualified individuals divided by the amount of tax credit, not including any additional credit allowed pursuant to subparagraphs (D) and (E) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), as computed by the California Film Commission. For the purposes of the calculation of the jobs ratio only, 70 percent of qualified expenditures for visual effects paid to third-party vendors for work performed in California shall be deemed to be qualified wages paid to a qualified individual.

(9) “Licensing” means any grant of rights to distribute the qualified motion picture, in whole or in part.

(10) “New use” means any
 use of a motion picture in a medium other than the medium for which it was initially created.

(11) “Pilot for a new television series” means the initial episode produced for a proposed television series.
